Massachusetts, session 194th, H290.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
Section 16XX the following new section : -
Section 16XX. (a) In this chapter the following terms, unless a contrary meaning is
required by the context or is specifically prescribed, shall have the following meanings:
“Service Provider” is a public or private nonprofit organization that provides supportive
services to a mature minor experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness in need of
supportive services.
“Supportive Services” shall mean interventions, services, or resources necessary to assist
a mature minor experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness in acquiring or
maintaining: (1) stable housing; (2) permanent connections, including ongoing attachments to
families, communities, schools, and other positive social networks; (3) financial stability; (4)
of 3

education, employment or income, including high performance in completion of education and
training activities, especially for younger youth, and starting and maintaining adequate and stable
employment, particularly for older youth; or (5) social and emotional wellbeing, including the
development of key competencies, attitudes, and behaviors that equip a young person to succeed
across multiple domains of daily life, including school, work, relationships, and community.
“Mature minor experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness” or “mature minor”
shall be a minor who (1) is 15 years of age or older; (2) is not in the physical custody of a parent
or legal guardian; (3) lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as defined in
section 16W, chapter 6A; or (3) whose status or circumstances indicate a significant danger of
experiencing homelessness in the near future. The minor shall also be able to understand the
circumstances and implications of the situation in which they are involved and is able to
participate in the decision making process without excessive anxiety or fear.
(b) A mature minor experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness in need of
supportive services may consent to such services if the service provider reasonably believes that:
(1) the mature minor understands the significant benefits, responsibilities, risks, and limits of the
services and can communicate an informed consent; (2) the mature minor understands the
requirements and rules of receiving the services; and (3) the services are necessary to ensure the
mature minor’s safety and wellbeing.
(c) A mature minor experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness in need of
supportive services who is a parent may consent to supportive services for their child.
of 3

(d) Any provider receiving funding from the Executive Office of Health and Human
Services’ Homeless Youth Services Division may provide services to a mature minor after they
obtain informed and written consent from the mature minor.
(e) The informed written consent from the mature minor shall state their: (1) age; (2)
guardianship status, if known; and (3) current living situation.
(f) A service provider may not provide supportive services to a mature minor if the
service provider has knowledge that the mature minor: (1) knowingly provided false information
in the written consent required under subsection (e) of this section; or (2) does not meet the
definition of mature minor in need of supportive services under subsection (a) and (b) of this
section.
(g) Any provider who renders supportive services to a mature minor in need of supportive
services in compliance with this section shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability,
unless such liability arises from the provider’s gross negligence or willful or wanton acts or
omissions.
(h) The Office of Children, Youth, and Families shall adopt regulations to carry out this
section.
of 3